Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-835
Probationary certificated employee; superintendent; school board; special procedures applicable.

The hearing for a probationary certificated employee, except a superintendent, provided in section 79-834, may be held before a committee of the school board consisting of not less than three of the board's total members. Notice of such a hearing shall be sent to all board members five days prior to such hearing. If a hearing is held before such a committee, the majority opinion of the committee shall constitute a recommendation to the school board with the final determination being made by a majority vote of the members of the school board without additional hearing. The hearing for a superintendent provided in such section shall not be held before a committee of the school board. Notice shall be given to all parties at least five days prior to such a hearing. A vote of the majority of the members of the school board shall determine final action relative to the contract of the superintendent.

Laws 1982, LB 259, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 177, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-12,117;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 465.